Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-204
Barber; certificate; qualifications required.

A person is qualified to receive a certificate of registration to practice barbering (1) who has a diploma showing graduation from high school or an equivalent education as determined by passing a general education development test; (2) who is at least seventeen years of age; (3) who has completed one thousand eight hundred hours of training in a barber school or college; (4) who has graduated from a barber school or college approved by the Board of Barber Examiners; and (5) who has passed an examination conducted by the Board of Barber Examiners to determine his or her fitness to practice barbering.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 4, p. 428;

Laws 1929, c. 154, § 3, p. 535;

C.S.1929, § 71-2004;

R.S.1943, § 71-204;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 4, p. 1317;

Laws 1965, c. 417, § 3, p. 1330;

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 16;

Laws 1984, LB 900, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 143;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 81.
July 19, 2018